Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 6 Salary, Retirement, Death, and Disability Benefits

47-23-100.
Salary defined.

As used in this article, the term “salary” means:

For superior court judges, the earnable monthly compensation from state funds provided by law for judges of the superior courts on the date the member begins receiving a retirement benefit;

For district attorneys, the earnable monthly compensation from state funds provided by law for district attorneys on the date the member begins receiving a retirement benefit;

For judges and solicitors-general of state courts, the average earnable monthly compensation received as such judge or solicitor-general; provided, however, that for members who become members after July 1, 1998, such amount shall not exceed the salary from state funds provided by law for superior court judges;

For juvenile court judges, the average earnable monthly compensation received as such juvenile judge; provided, however, that for members who become members after July 1, 1998, such amount shall not exceed the salary from state funds provided by law for superior court judges;

For any person who is a member of the retirement system pursuant to Code Section 47-23-49, his or her average earnable monthly compensation; and

For any member who is a member of the retirement system for whom the provisions of Code Section 47-23-43.1 are applicable, his or her average earnable monthly compensation.

The monthly employee contributions made by the employer on behalf of the member under Code Sections 47-23-80, 47-23-81, and 47-23-82 shall be used in the computation of the member’s salary for the computation of the member’s retirement benefits.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a member’s salary shall be subject to limitations set forth in Code Section 47-1-13.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-100

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 20, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 36/HB 460; Ga. L. 2020, p. 14, § 2/HB 663; Ga. L. 2020, p. 46, § 2/HB 664.

The 2020 amendments.

The first 2020 amendment, effective July 1, 2020, in subsection (a), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(3), substituted “; and” for the period at the end of paragraph (a)(4), and added paragraph (a)(5). The second 2020 amendment, effective July 1, 2020, in subsection (a), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(3), substituted “; and” for the period at the end of paragraph (a)(4), and added paragraph (a)(5).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, paragraph (a)(5) as enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 46, § 2/HB 664 was redesignated as paragraph (a)(6), “; and” was deleted from the end of paragraph (a)(4) and added to the end of paragraph (a)(5).

47-23-101.
Calculation of benefits based on salary after July 1, 1998.

For members who become members after July 1, 1998, no portion of any salary, as defined in Code Section 47-23-100, earned after July 1, 1998, which is used to calculate benefits under this retirement system may be used to calculate benefits under any other state or local retirement system or pension plan.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-101

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-102.
Vesting; benefits upon retirement; compliance with federal income tax laws.

The right of a member to receive benefits under this chapter shall vest after the member obtains ten years of creditable service; provided, however, that no member shall receive a retirement benefit prior to attaining the age of 60 years. Except as otherwise provided in Article 2 of Chapter 1 of this title, a member’s accumulated contributions shall be 100 percent vested and nonforfeitable at all times. Any member retiring on or after July 1, 1996, and any member who was retired on July 1, 1996, with 16 years or more of creditable service shall receive a benefit equal to 66.66 percent, plus 1 percent for each year of creditable service over 16 years, of the member’s salary; provided, however, that no member shall receive more than 24 years of creditable service. Any member retiring with less than 16 years of creditable service may retire at a reduced benefit pursuant to Code Section 47-23-103. Normal retirement age under this retirement system shall be the date the member has reached age 60 years of age, provided that he or she has at least ten years of creditable service. For purposes of Section 402(1) of the federal Internal Revenue Code regarding distributions from governmental plans for health and long-term care insurance for public safety officers, normal retirement age shall be the earliest date when the member has satisfied the requirements for a retirement under this or the predecessor retirement system. Except as otherwise provided in Article 2 of Chapter 1 of this title, a member’s right to his or her retirement allowance is nonforfeitable upon attainment of normal retirement age. Any member who was retired on July 1, 1996, with more than 16 years of creditable service shall receive in July, 1998, a one-time benefit payment equal to two times the product of 1 percent of the salary paid to such judge at the time of his or her retirement multiplied by the number of years of creditable service in excess of 16 years.

The board is authorized to provide by rule or regulation for the payment of benefits to members or beneficiaries of the retirement system at a time and under circumstances not provided for in this chapter to the extent that such payment is required to maintain the retirement system as a qualified retirement plan for the purposes of federal income tax laws and regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-102

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 33/HB 202; Ga. L. 2013, p. 681, § 1/SB 142.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 11, 2009, added the second sentence, and added the fifth through seventh sentences.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, Code Section 47-23-102 as enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1153, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 47-24-102.

Editor’s notes.

Pursuant to Section 2 of Ga. L. 1998, p. 147, which reads, “If that legislation creating the Georgia Judicial Retirement System, designated as 1997 House Bill 751, is enacted and becomes law, this Act shall amend Code Section 47-23-102 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated created by such Act,”, the amendments to subsection (b) of Code Section 47-9-70 (which was repealed by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 2) and newly enacted Code Section 47-23-102 were construed together to read as set out above.

47-23-103.
Retirement based on age; application to retire.

In lieu of retirement at the benefit level provided by Code Section 47-23-102, a member may retire at any time after attaining the age of 60 years and after obtaining a minimum of ten years of creditable service. The monthly retirement benefit for such early retirement shall be a percentage of the benefit under Code Section 47-23-102, and such percentage shall be the proportion which the number of years of creditable service the member has in the retirement system bears to 16.

The effective date of retirement shall be the first day of the month in which the application is received by the board of trustees, provided that no retirement shall, in any case, be effective earlier than the first day of the month following the final month of the applicant’s employment. Applications for retirement shall not be accepted more than 90 days in advance of the effective date of retirement.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-103

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 37/HB 460; Ga. L. 2006, p. 1010, § 4/HB 1020.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “Code Section 47-23-102” was substituted for “Code Section 47-23-100” in the last sentence of subsection (a).

47-23-104.
Disability; determination of benefits; determining disability.

After obtaining a minimum of four years of creditable service, any member who becomes totally and permanently disabled to the extent that he or she is unable to perform the duties of his or her office shall be entitled to receive a disability retirement benefit which shall be one-half of the maximum retirement benefits provided by Code Section 47-23-102 for 16 years of service, unless the member would otherwise qualify for a greater benefit under Code Section 47-23-102 or 47-23-103, in which event the Code section providing the highest benefit would apply.

After obtaining a minimum of ten years of actual service, any member who becomes totally and permanently disabled to the extent that he or she is unable to perform the duties of his or her office shall be entitled to receive a disability retirement benefit which shall be two-thirds of the maximum retirement benefits provided by Code Section 47-23-102.

The disability of any member applying for disability retirement benefits shall be determined by the board in the same manner and under the same procedure as disability of state employees is determined in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. Disability retirement benefits shall become effective on the first day of the month following the month the member resigns as a result of the disability.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-104

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-105.
Spouses’ benefits; ceasing spouses’ benefits; vesting; designation of survivors benefits; member who rejected survivor’s benefits may later elect such benefits by paying actuarial cost; applicability.

Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of this Code section, each member of this retirement system shall pay for spouses’ benefits an employee contribution of 2 1/2 percent of the salary paid to such member. Such contribution shall be in addition to that required under Article 5 of this chapter. The employing unit shall be authorized to deduct monthly the employee contributions required for spouses’ benefits. Such contribution shall cease after the member has paid the contribution for a total of 16 years.

Upon the death of a member who is subject to this subsection and who has attained a minimum of ten years of creditable service and at least 60 years of age, the surviving spouse of such member shall be entitled to receive for life a monthly sum equal to 50 percent of the retirement benefit which the member was receiving at the time of the member’s death, if retired at such time, or which would have been payable to the member had the member retired as of the date of the member’s death.

Upon the death of a member who became a member by operation of Code Section 47-23-40 and who has attained a minimum of ten years of creditable service but had not attained age 60 at the time of death, the surviving spouse of such member shall be entitled to receive for life a monthly sum equal to 50 percent of the retirement benefit the member would have received had the member continued in service and retired at age 60.

Upon the death of a member other than a member who became a member by operation of Code Section 47-23-40 and who has attained a minimum of ten years of creditable service but had not attained age 60 at the time of death, the surviving spouse of such member shall be entitled to receive for life a monthly sum equal to 50 percent of the retirement benefit the member would have received as if the member were age 60 on the date of death based on the number of years of creditable service the member had on the date of death.

Any member of this retirement system shall have the right to reject the spouses’ benefits provided by this Code section by notifying the board in writing of such rejection on a form to be supplied by the board within 90 days after becoming a member.

Any member who becomes a member of this retirement system by operation of Code Section 47-23-40 who rejected the spouses’ benefits provided by this Code section pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection may subsequently obtain such benefits by so notifying the board in writing and by tendering all amounts which such member would have paid pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section if such member had not rejected such benefits, together with regular interest thereon.

Any member, other than a member who became a member of this retirement system by operation of Code Section 47-23-40, who rejected the spouses’ benefits provided by this Code section pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection may subsequently obtain such benefits by so notifying the board in writing and by tendering to the board of trustees such amount as determined by the actuary as necessary to grant such benefit without creating any accrued actuarial liability as to this retirement system. In order to vest for spouses’ benefits, the member must have at least ten years of membership service.

If the spouse of a member dies or if a member ceases to be married, then such member who has elected to obtain spouses’ benefits pursuant to this Code section may cease making the employee contributions for spouses’ benefits. Such member shall notify the board in writing to cease deducting such employee contributions. Such notice shall be given within 90 days after the date of the death of the spouse or after the date the member ceases to be married; and, upon such notification, no further deductions shall be made. When a member ceases to make such employee contributions, there shall be no return of such contributions previously made by such member.

Any member of this retirement system who rejects spouses’ benefits coverage or who ceases such coverage pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section because such member was unmarried at the time of such rejection, because such member’s spouse died, or because such member ceased to be married shall have the option to elect spouses’ benefits within 90 days after becoming married or remarried, as the case may be. Any member so electing must make the necessary contributions for spouses’ benefits coverage for a total of at least ten years with regular interest thereon in order for such member’s spouse to qualify for the spouses’ benefits provided for by this Code section.

In order to vest for spouses’ benefits, the member must have made the employee contributions for such benefits for at least ten years.

Any member at the time of retirement who has met the conditions of subsection (e) of this Code section may designate a natural person other than his or her spouse to receive a survivors benefit in the same manner and under the same conditions as provided for spouses’ benefits; provided, however, that any person so designated shall receive a benefit equal to the normal spouse’s benefit actuarially reduced in accordance to such person’s and the member’s projected life spans. Such actuarial adjustment shall be computed at regular interest upon the basis of the mortality tables and rates of interest last adopted by the board of trustees. Such benefit shall not exceed 50 percent of the member’s monthly retirement benefit.

The provisions of this Code section shall apply only to persons who become members of this retirement system prior to July 1, 2012.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-105

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 20, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 38/HB 460; Ga. L. 2012, p. 669, § 2/HB 250.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added paragraph (b)(3) and subsection (g).

47-23-105.1.
Modification of retirement allowance.

The provisions of this Code section shall apply only to persons who become members of this retirement system on or after July 1, 2012.

A member may make a one-time election to convert the retirement allowance otherwise payable to him or her into a modified retirement allowance of equivalent actuarial value and designate a natural person to receive a survivors benefit in accordance with one of the options set forth in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this subsection. Such retirement allowance shall be actuarially reduced in accordance to the designated survivor’s projected life span. Such actuarial adjustment shall be computed upon the basis of the mortality tables and rates of interest last adopted by the board of trustees. Such election may be made only after the member has become eligible to retire and before the first payment of his or her retirement allowance normally becomes due. Such election shall be irrevocable except as otherwise provided in this Code section.

Option one, known as the 100 percent joint and survivor option, shall consist of a reduced retirement allowance which is payable during the life of the retired member and which, upon his or her death, shall be continued at the same rate throughout the life of and paid to the designated survivor.

Option two, known as the 66 2/3 percent joint and survivor option, shall consist of a reduced retirement allowance which is payable during the life of the retired member and which, upon his or her death, shall be continued at the rate of two-thirds the reduced retirement allowance throughout the life of and paid to the designated survivor.

Option three, known as the 50 percent joint and survivor option, shall consist of a reduced retirement allowance which is payable during the life of the retired member and which, upon his or her death, shall be continued at the rate of one-half the reduced retirement allowance throughout the life of and paid to the designated survivor.

Option four, known as the pop-up option, shall be the election of options one, two, or three, with the added provision that in the event the designated survivor predeceases the retired member, the retirement allowance payable to the retired member after the death of the designated survivor shall be equal to the maximum retirement allowance which the retired member would have been entitled to receive under this chapter had such election not been made.

In the event a member is not married at the time he or she retires and the retired member does not elect a survivor’s option and such member subsequently marries, the retired member may elect to begin receiving an actuarially reduced benefit of equivalent value and establish on behalf of the newly acquired spouse an option under this Code section. Such election shall be made within six months after the marriage.

In the event a retired member makes an election under subsection (b) of this Code section on behalf of a spouse and such spouse predeceases the retired member and the retired member subsequently remarries, the retired member may elect to begin receiving an actuarially reduced benefit of equivalent value and establish on behalf of a new designated survivor pursuant to an option under this Code section.

In the event a retired member makes an election under subsection (b) of this Code section on behalf of a spouse and a final judgment of complete divorce from the spouse is entered, then:

The retired member may elect to continue the optional allowance with the former spouse designated to receive all amounts and benefits upon the death of the retired member; or

The retired member may revoke the appointment of such spouse as a beneficiary; provided, however, that in such event the retirement benefit received by the retired member shall not increase. Such revocation may be made at any time after the entry of the final judgment of divorce. If the retired member elects to revoke the election, the spouse shall be treated in the same manner as if he or she had predeceased the retired member under subsection (d) of this Code section.

If an active vested member of this retirement system dies and is survived by a legal spouse, such spouse shall receive a benefit as if the member has retired on the date of his or her death and had elected option three.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-105.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 669, § 3/HB 250.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2012.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2012, a period was added at the end of the third sentence of subsection (b) and “as if” was substituted for “as is” in the last sentence of paragraph (e)(2).

47-23-106.
County supplement of salaries.

Whenever any county within a judicial circuit supplements the state salary paid to active superior court judges or the district attorney of said circuit, the governing authority of such county shall be authorized, but not required, to supplement the benefit being paid pursuant to this chapter to any retired superior court judge or district attorney of said circuit who is receiving benefits pursuant to this chapter or to supplement the benefit being paid pursuant to this chapter to any beneficiary of any deceased superior court judge or district attorney.

Whenever any county which has a state court supplements the salary of the judges or solicitors-general of such court, the governing authority of such county shall be authorized, but not required, to supplement the benefit being paid pursuant to this chapter to any retired state court judge of such court who is receiving benefits pursuant to this chapter or supplement the benefit being paid pursuant to this chapter to any beneficiary of any deceased state court judge.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-106

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-107.
Appointing beneficiary.

If there is no surviving spouse or survivor of a member covered by Code Section 47-23-105 or if a member not covered by such Code section dies before retirement, the amount of accumulated contributions made by such member, with regular interest on such amount, shall be paid to his or her named beneficiary, if any, or to the living person, if any, nominated by written designation of the member duly executed and filed with the board, otherwise to the member’s estate.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-107

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.

47-23-108.
Withdrawal of funds.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, if a member ceases to be employed in a covered position, he or she may withdraw the total sum, with 6 percent interest, which he or she has paid into the fund. The member shall not be eligible at any time after such withdrawal to become a member of the fund, unless at a later date he or she becomes employed in a covered position, in which event he or she shall be reinstated into the fund as if he or she had never before been a member. Any such reinstated member shall have the privilege of reestablishing any prior creditable service, provided that the member repays into the retirement system an amount equal to the amount withdrawn, which shall be placed in the employee contribution accumulation fund, together with 6 percent interest from the date of withdrawal to the date of repayment, which interest shall be placed in the pension accumulation fund. The employee contributions paid by the employer as provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 47-23-80 shall be considered to be payments made by the member.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-108

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 39/HB 460.

47-23-109.
Cessation of retirement allowance for resuming state service; required notification.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, if any retired member returns to the service of the state in any position, including, without limitation, service directly or indirectly as or for an independent contractor, except as a member of the General Assembly, his or her retirement allowance shall cease. Upon cessation of such service, the retired member, after proper notification to the board, shall receive the same retirement allowance which he or she was receiving prior to returning to state service, calculated with any increases granted during the period of compensation.

The retirement allowance of a retired member who returns to the service of the state in any position, including, without limitation, service directly or indirectly as or for an independent contractor, other than as a member of the General Assembly shall not cease, provided that such member performs no more than 1,040 hours of such service in any calendar year.

Any state entity that employs a retired plan member, other than for service in the General Assembly as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, shall within 30 days of the employee’s accepting employment notify the board in writing stating the name of the plan member and the number of hours the employee is expected to work annually and shall provide such other information as the board may request. If the retired plan member performs more than 1,040 hours of work in any calendar year, the employer shall so notify the board as soon as such information is available. Any employer that fails to notify the board as required by this subsection shall reimburse the retirement system for any benefits wrongfully paid. It shall be the duty of the retired plan member seeking employment by the employer to notify the employer of his or her retirement status prior to accepting such position. If a retired plan member fails to so notify the employer and the employer becomes liable to the retirement system, the plan member shall hold the employer harmless for all such liability.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-109

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 752, § 1/SB 98; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 34/HB 202; Ga. L. 2013, p. 681, § 2/SB 142.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, substituted “State Personnel Administration” for “State Merit System of Personnel Administration” at the end of subsection (b). The second 2009 amendment, effective May 11, 2009, in the first sentence of subsection (a), inserted “who has not yet reached normal retirement age” and inserted “, including, without limitation, service directly or indirectly as or for an independent contractor,”; and, in subsection (b), inserted “who has reached normal retirement age and”, inserted “, including, without limitation, service directly or indirectly as or for an independent contractor,”, and deleted “; provided, however, that no such retired member shall be eligible for employee health benefits other than those available to the member as a part of his or her retirement benefits or for any annual leave, any sick leave, or any other employee benefits available to a state employee in the classified service of the State Merit System of Personnel Administration” following “year” at the end. See the Code Commission notes regarding the effect of these amendments.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “who has not yet reached normal retirement age” following “member” near the beginning of the first sentence of subsection (a); in subsection (b), deleted “who has reached normal retirement age and” preceding “returns” near the beginning and inserted a comma following “cease” in the middle; and added subsection (c).

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2009, p. 752, § 1, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 34. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

47-23-110.
Service as a senior judge.

Any member retired under this chapter or vested for a benefit under this chapter may serve as a senior judge as provided for in Code Section 15-1-9.2 or Code Section 15-1-9.3 or as otherwise provided by legislation enacted after July 1, 1998, and compensation for such service shall not affect, enhance, diminish, or otherwise impair the payment or receipt of any retirement or pension benefits of such judge.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-23-110

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 1.